Oklahoma, session 2026, SB518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.18, as
last amended by Section 144, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 427.18), is amended to read as follows:
Section 427.18. A. A medical marijuana business shall not
sell, transfer or otherwise distribute medical marijuana or medical
marijuana product that has not been packaged and labeled in
accordance with this section and rules promulgated by the Executive
Director of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority.
B. A medical marijuana dispensary shall return medical
marijuana and medical marijuana product that does not meet packaging
or labeling requirements in this section or rules promulgated
pursuant thereto to the entity who transferred it to the dispensary.
The medical marijuana dispensary shall document to whom the item was
returned, what was returned, and the date of the return, or dispose
of any usable marijuana that does not meet these requirements in
accordance with the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient
Protection Act.

C. 1. Medical marijuana packaging shall be packaged to
minimize its appeal to children and shall not depict images other
than the business name logo of the medical marijuana producer and
image of the product.
2. A medical marijuana business shall not place any content on
a container in a manner that reasonably appears to target
individuals under the age of twenty-one (21) including, but not
limited to, cartoon characters or similar images.
3. Labels on a container shall not include any false or
misleading statements.
4. No container shall be intentionally or knowingly labeled so
as to cause a reasonable patient confusion as to whether the medical
marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate or medical marijuana
product is a trademarked product or labeled in a manner that
violates any federal trademark law or regulation. The label on the
container shall include a warning that states the following:
a. “For use by licensed medical marijuana patients only”,
and
b. “Keep out of reach of children”,
c. “It is illegal to drive a motor vehicle while under
the influence of marijuana or marijuana products”,
d. "Women should not use marijuana or marijuana products
during pregnancy because of the risk of birth
defects", and
e. "This product has been tested for contaminants".
5. The label on the container shall not make any claims
regarding health or physical benefits to the patient.
6. The container itself may be clear in order to allow licensed
medical marijuana patients and licensed medical marijuana caregivers
the ability to view the product inside the container but shall be
child-resistant, as defined in Section 427.2 of this title.
ENR. S. B. NO. 518 Page 2

7. At the point of sale and transfer of any medical marijuana,
medical marijuana concentrate, or medical marijuana products to a
licensed medical marijuana patient or licensed medical marijuana
caregiver, the dispensary shall place the medical marijuana, medical
marijuana concentrate, or medical marijuana products in an exit
package, as such term is defined in Section 427.2 of this title.
D. The Executive Director shall develop minimum standards for
packaging and labeling of medical marijuana, medical marijuana
concentrate, and medical marijuana products. Such standards shall
include, but not be limited to, the required contents of labels to
be affixed to all medical marijuana, medical marijuana concentrate,
and medical marijuana products prior to transfer to a licensed
patient or caregiver, which shall include, at a minimum:
1. THC and other cannabinoid potency, and terpenoid potency;
2. A statement indicating that the product has been tested for
contaminants;
3. One or more product warnings to be determined by the
Executive Director; and
4. Any other information the Executive Director deems
necessary.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 518 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 13th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 518 Page 4